Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 23-3101 to 23-3115 shall be known and may be cited as the County Purchasing Act.

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 828, § 3.